Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3130.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings and purpose.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) The State of Rhode Island recognizes that public libraries are essential civic institutions
that provide free and equitable access to information, literacy resources, educational opportunities,
technology, and cultural enrichment for residents of all ages;
(2) Rhode Island’s public libraries play a critical role in supporting early childhood literacy,
K–12 student achievement, higher education, and lifelong learning, thereby advancing the
educational and economic well-being of the state;
(3) Many public library buildings and facilities within the state are aging, undersized, or
otherwise inadequate to meet current and emerging community needs, including the demand for
digital access, collaborative learning spaces, quiet study areas, and flexible community
programming;
(4) Numerous library facilities require construction, renovation, or modernization in order
to comply with current health, safety, and accessibility standards, including requirements under the
Americans with Disabilities Act (the “ADA”), and to ensure that all residents of the state, including
individuals with disabilities and older adults, can safely and fully utilize library services;
(5) Investment in the construction, renovation, and modernization of public library
facilities promotes local economic development, supports small businesses and workforce
development programs, creates construction and related jobs, and enhances the quality of life in

communities throughout the state;
(6) Energy efficient, resilient, and technologically up-to-+date library buildings reduce
operating costs for municipalities, advance the state’s environmental and resilience goals, and
ensure continuity of essential community services during emergencies;
(7) Modern, well equipped public libraries serve as vital community hubs that support civic
engagement, public meetings, community partnerships, access to government information, and
emergency response and recovery efforts;
(8) Rhode Island state Regulations for Library Construction Reimbursement were
promulgated in 2018 (the “2018 regulations”) and refiled without change on January 4, 2022;
(9) The 2018 regulations provide for fifty percent (50%) reimbursement of expenditures
for eligible projects subject to reimbursement caps that were established in 2018;
(10) Publicly available data reflect that, between 2019 and 2025 the Boston Consumer
Price Index (a commonly used measure of inflation for the region) has increased between 1.1% and
7.1% annually, resulting in a total cumulative inflationary increase of 23.4% over that period;
(11) Due to this sustained inflation, library projects can no longer be feasibly undertaken
within the reimbursement caps set forth in the 2018 regulations; and
(12) The general assembly finds that it is in the public interest to increase, by statute, the
reimbursement caps established in the 2018 regulations on an interim basis, pending promulgation
of amended regulations.
SECTION 2. Section 29-6-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 29-6 entitled "State Aid to
Libraries" is hereby amended to read as follows:
29-6-6. Construction and capital improvements.
The office of library and information services may cause to be paid to a city or town
treasurer, or to any free public library in the state, a grant-in-aid for the construction and capital
improvement of any free public library as the chief of library services may determine is necessary
and desirable to provide better free library services to the public, which shall be paid in accordance
with the following provisions:
(1) No grant-in-aid shall be made unless the city or town receiving the grant-in-aid shall
cause to be appropriated for the same purpose an amount from its own funds and not from any
federal grant or other federal financial assistance equal to, or more than, the state grant-in-aid, or
unless funds from private sources are dedicated for the same purpose in an amount equal to, or
more than, the state grant-in-aid, or unless the total of the city or town appropriation and the funds
from private sources for the same purpose is equal to, or more than, the state grant-in-aid.
(2) The state grant-in-aid may be paid in installments over a period of years up to a
LC006151 - Page 2 of 5

maximum of twenty (20) years, beginning in the fiscal year during which the project is accepted
by the office of library and information services. Whenever a grant-in-aid is paid on the installment
basis permitted herein, there shall be included in the state grant-in-aid the interest cost actually
incurred by the city or town, or any free public library, as a result of its having to borrow the state’s
portion of the total cost of the library project. The amount of this interest cost shall be computed
on the actual interest cost paid by the city or town, or free public library, less any applicable accrued
interest, premiums, which are not applied to project costs, and profits from investments, over the
period of time elapsing between the date borrowed funds are made available and the date of the last
installment payment of the state grant-in-aid. Interest cost incurred by the city or town, or any free
public library, as a result of having to borrow its portion of the total cost of the library project shall
not be considered a part of the total cost of the project for the purposes of matching provided for in
subdivision (1) of this section. Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the office of library and
information services from accelerating the schedule of annual installments, or from paying the
balance due of the state’s grant-in-aid in a lump sum; provided, however, that the state grant-in-aid
in any fiscal year shall include no less than one-twentieth (⅟₂₀) of the state’s total reimbursable
principal obligations.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of the state regulations for library construction
reimbursement promulgated in 2018 (the “2018 regulations”), which regulations were filed without
change on January 4, 2022, the reimbursement caps for eligible project costs incurred during the
period commencing June 30, 2025 and ending on June 30, 2031, or ending on such earlier date as
the office of library information services promulgates amendments to the 2018 regulations which
increase reimbursement caps to amounts above those amounts set forth in this subsection for the
effective period shall be as follows:
(i) Construction costs are eligible for fifty percent (50%) reimbursement of expenditures
up to the amount of three hundred seventy dollars and twenty cents ($370.20) per square foot for
new construction or three hundred and eight dollars and fifty cents ($308.50) per square foot for
renovation and remodeling. If the actual construction costs exceed one or both of these amounts
per square foot, the state share shall be based on the not-to-exceeded amounts. Cost per square foot
shall be determined by the cost of contracts for new construction and/or contracts for expansion,
remodeling and alteration of existing buildings.
(ii) Site costs, including demolition, sitework, the acquisition of a site or building, site
improvement and parking lots, are reimbursable up to the lesser amount of one million two hundred
thirty-four thousand dollars ($1,234,000) or ten percent (10%) of the total project cost less the site
costs.
LC006151 - Page 3 of 5

(iii) The total amount of reimbursement for any project shall not exceed twelve million
three hundred forty thousand dollars ($12,340,000).
(iv) Allowable costs include financing leases, but not operating leases, of library facilities,
including land acquisition, construction, renovation, expansion, landscaping, parking facilities,
fixtures, furnishings and equipment, fire suppression systems, and expenses related to meeting a
high performance green building standard such as, but not limited to, the Leadership in Energy and
Environmental Design (“LEED”) standard. Any library or municipality that finances or refinances
a project with bonds, notes, financing leases, or other evidences of indebtedness shall not require
pre-approval from the office of library services, but shall file the financing or refinancing
documents with the office of library services after the financing transaction is complete.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of law or agreement to the contrary, the increases in the
caps on state grant-in-aid reimbursement for construction or capital improvement projects pursuant
to the provisions of this subsection shall apply retroactively to all eligible project costs incurred on
or after July 1, 2025, whether the costs are subject to reimbursement under agreements executed
before, on, or after June 1, 2025. All reimbursement agreements for construction or capital
improvement projects executed by the office of library and information services shall be deemed
amended by operation of law to incorporate the increased caps with respect to eligible project costs
incurred during the effective period, and the office of library and information services is authorized
and directed to adjust reimbursement payments accordingly, subject to the availability of
appropriated funds. Any maximum dollar amount, percentage, or other cap on state grant-in-aid
reimbursement for construction or capital improvement projects established under, this subsection
shall automatically increase by three percent (3%) on July 1 of each year, beginning July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006151
========
LC006151 - Page 4 of 5